Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 5. Directors and Protectors

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-501.
Board of directors.

A statutory foundation shall maintain a board of directors.

Unless the articles of formation or operating agreement of a statutory foundation provide otherwise:

The board of directors of the foundation shall have the authority to exercise all powers of the foundation and to manage foundation affairs;

The board of directors shall consist of one (1) or more persons;

One (1) or more founders may be appointed as a director; and

No director shall simultaneously serve as a director and a protector for the same statutory foundation.

A board of directors shall conduct the affairs of the statutory foundation in accordance with the articles of formation and operating agreement of the statutory foundation, as well as this act and any other applicable provision of law.

Each director shall act:

In good faith; and

In a manner not opposed to the best interests of the statutory foundation.

An act of a director shall be retroactively valid despite any defect that may be found in:

The appointment of the director; or

The qualifications of the director.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 98, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, in (c), deleted ", if any," following "operating agreement" and added "statutory" preceding "foundation, as well"; and added "or" at the end of (e)(i).

Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-502.
Liability of directors.

A director is not personally liable for the acts, omissions, obligations, debts or other liabilities of a statutory foundation, whether arising in contract, tort or otherwise.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 98, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

added "or other liabilities," substitutd "a" for "the" preceding "statutory foundation" and made a related change.

Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-503.
Protector.

If a statutory foundation has a charitable purpose, the foundation shall maintain a protector in relation to that purpose.

If a statutory foundation has any purpose permitted under this act other than a charitable purpose, then the foundation may have a protector in relation to that purpose.

Except as otherwise provided by law and by W.S.

17-30-501

, a founder or other person may be appointed as the protector of a statutory foundation.

The operating agreement of a statutory foundation may authorize a protector to approve or disapprove any specified action of the board of directors of the statutory foundation.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 98, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

added “and by W.S.

17-30-501

” in (c).

Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-504.
Protector as a fiduciary.

A protector shall serve as a fiduciary to the extent of authority and duties granted under the terms of the operating agreement.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-505.
Liability of protector.

A protector shall not be personally liable for the acts, omissions, debts, obligations or other liabilities of a statutory foundation, whether arising in contract, tort or otherwise.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 2.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 2.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 98, §§ 1, 2, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, by ch. 98, §§ 1, 2, in (a), substituted "A protector shall not be personally liable for" for "Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section," added "acts, omissions,"; repealed (a)(i) and (a)(ii), which read, "(i) Are solely the debts, obligations or other liabilities of the foundation; and (ii) Do not become the debts, obligations or other liabilities of a protector solely by reason of the protector performing his duties" and made a related change; repealed (b), which read, "A court may impose liability for the debts, obligations or other liabilities of the statutory foundation on a protector in the following circumstances, except that no single factor other than fraud is sufficient to impose liability: (i) Fraud; (ii) Inadequate capitalization; (iii) Failure to observe foundation formalities as required by law; (iv) Intermingling of assets, business operations and finances of the foundation and the protector to such an extent that there is no distinction between them"; and repealed (c), which read, "A court shall not consider factors intrinsic to the character and operation of a statutory foundation under subsection (b) of this section. These factors shall include: (i) The ability to elect treatment as a disregarded or pass-through entity for tax purposes; (ii) Flexible operation or organization, including the failure to observe any particular formality relating to the exercise of the powers of the foundation or management of activities; (iii) The exercise of ownership, influence and governance by a protector; (iv) The protection of the personal assets of the protector from the obligations and acts of the foundation."

Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-506.
Conflict of interest transactions.

A sale, encumbrance or other transaction involving the investment or management of the property of the statutory foundation which is entered into by a director or protector for the personal account of the director or protector or which is otherwise affected by a conflict between the fiduciary or personal interests of the director or protector is voidable by a beneficiary affected by the transaction unless:

The transaction was authorized by the terms of the operating agreement;

The transaction was approved by a court;

The beneficiary did not commence a judicial proceeding within the time specified by W.S.

4-10-1005

;

The beneficiary consented to the transaction, ratified the transaction or released the director or protector pursuant to W.S.

4-10-1009

; or

The transaction involves a contract entered into, or claim acquired by the director or protector, before the person became or contemplated becoming a director or protector.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.